apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="dépourv/oir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>oie</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oie</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oient</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oient</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oies</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oir</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oira</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirai</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oiraient</l>  <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirais</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirais</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirait</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oiras</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirez</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oiriez</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirions</l>   <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oirons</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oiront</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ois</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ois</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ois</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ois</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oit</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyaient</l>   <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyais</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyais</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyait</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyant</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>oyant</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>oyez</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyez</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyez</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyiez</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyiez</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyions</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyions</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyons</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyons</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oyons</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ue</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ues</l>       <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urent</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usse</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussent</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usses</l>     <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussiez</l>    <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussions</l>   <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûmes</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ût</l>        <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûtes</l>      <r>oir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dî/mes__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eau__n" c="autoconcord:f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bede/au__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>au</l>        <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aux</l>       <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>au<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bedeau">          <i>bede</i><par n="bede/au__n"/></e>
<e lm="bourreau">        <i>bourre</i><par n="bede/au__n"/></e>
<e lm="chameau">         <i>chame</i><par n="bede/au__n"/></e>
<e lm="eau">             <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/></e>
<e lm="eau">             <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>javel</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>javel</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="eau">             <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l>de javel</l><r><g>de javel</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="eau de Cologne">  <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>Cologne</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>Cologne</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="eau de mer">      <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>mer</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>mer</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="eau de rose">     <i>eau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>rose</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>rose</g></r></p></e>
 <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="en">       <i>en</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="en">       <p><l><a/>en</l>    <r>en</r></p><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="nouveau">  <i>nouve</i><par n="bede/au__n"/></e>
<e lm="jumeau">          <i>jume</i><par n="bede/au__n"/></e>
<e lm="peau">            <i>peau</i><par n="eau__n"/></e>
<e lm="peau de chamois"> <i>peau</i><par n="eau__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>chamois</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>chamois</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pourvoir">        <i>pourv</i><par n="dépourv/oir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sceau">           <i>sceau</i><par n="eau__n"/></e>
<e lm="y">               <i>y</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
